Washington statutes.
RCW 11.11.060

Vesting of rights and powers under chapter.

The right to provide notice under RCW 11.11.050 and the entitlement of the testamentary beneficiary to the nonprobate asset vest immediately upon death of the owner. The power of the personal representative to direct the financial institution or other third party having the nonprobate asset in its possession or under its control to transfer or otherwise dispose of the asset arises upon the later of appointment of the personal representative or admission of the will to probate.

[ 1998 c 292 s 110.]